Hawaii statutes.
[PART IV.
MISCELLANEOUS]

Revision Note

Part heading designated pursuant to §23G-15.

§291-71 Designation of parking
spaces for electric vehicles; charging system. (a) Places of public
accommodation with at least one hundred parking spaces available for use by the
general public shall have at least one parking space exclusively for electric
vehicles and equipped with an electric vehicle charging system located anywhere
in the parking structure or lot by July 1, 2012; provided that no parking space
designated for electric vehicles shall displace or reduce accessible stalls
required by the Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Guidelines.
Spaces shall be designated, clearly marked, and the exclusive designation
enforced. Owners of multiple parking facilities within the State may designate
and electrify fewer parking spaces than required in one or more of their owned
properties; provided that the scheduled requirement is met for the total number
of aggregate spaces on all of their owned properties.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

"Electric vehicle" means:

(1) A neighborhood electric vehicle as defined in
section 286-2; or

(2) A vehicle, with four or more wheels, that draws
propulsion energy from a battery with at least four kilowatt hours of energy
storage capacity that can be recharged from an external source of electricity.

"Electric vehicle charging system"
means a system that:

(1) Is capable of providing electricity from a
non-vehicle source to charge the batteries of one or more electric vehicles;

(2) Meets recognized standards, including standard
SAE J1772 of SAE International; and

(3) Is designed and installed in compliance with
article 625 of the National Electrical Code.

"Place of public accommodation" has the
same meaning as that provided in section 489-2. [L 2009, c 156, pt of §4; am L 2012, c 89,
§2]

Note

L 2012, c 168, §2 (repealed June 30, 2020) provides:

"SECTION 2. (a) The department of transportation may
adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the
registration of, and issuance of special license plates for, electric vehicles.

(b) An electric vehicle on which an electric vehicle license
plate is affixed shall be exempt from payment of parking fees, including those
collected through parking meters, charged by any state or county authority in
this State, except that this exemption shall not apply:

(1) For more than
two and one-half hours of metered parking, or the maximum amount of time the
meter allows, whichever is longer; or

(2) To parking
fees assessed in increments longer than one twenty-four-hour day, including
weekly, monthly, or annual parking permits.

(c) An electric vehicle on which an electric vehicle license
plate is affixed shall be exempt from high occupancy vehicle lane restrictions.

(d) For the purposes of this Act:

"Electric vehicle" means:

(1) A neighborhood
electric vehicle; or

(2) A vehicle,
with four or more wheels, that draws propulsion energy from a battery with at
least four kilowatt hours of energy storage capacity that can be recharged from
an external source of electricity."

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next